Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.105

Records—Contents.

Each licensee and interim permit holder under this chapter shall keep records of all services rendered for a minimum of three years. These records shall contain the names and addresses of all persons to whom services were provided. Hearing aid specialists, audiologists, and interim permit holders shall also record the date the hearing instrument warranty expires, a description of the services and the dates the services were provided, and copies of any contracts and receipts. All records, as required pursuant to this chapter or by rule, shall be owned by the establishment or facility and shall remain with the establishment or facility in the event the licensee changes employment. If a contract between the establishment or facility and the licensee provides that the records are to remain with the licensee, copies of such records shall be provided to the establishment or facility.

[ 2014 c 189 s 9; 2002 c 310 s 11; 1998 c 142 s 7; 1996 c 200 s 14; 1989 c 198 s 6; 1983 c 39 s 16.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.